Arkansas, session 2025, SB397.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. DO NOT CODIFY. Legislative intent.
The General Assembly finds that:
(1) The services provided by freight railroads are essential to
the functionality of the state;
(2) It is the obligation of the General Assembly to protect rail
employees who are involved in accidents or incidents; and
(3) The requirements of this act are intended to eliminate, when
possible, undue harassment or assault of rail crew members involved in
railroad fatalities.

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code Title 23, Chapter 12, Subchapter 5, is
amended to add an additional section to read as follows:
23-12-515. Railroad fatality reports.
(a)(1) Except as provided in subsection (b) of this section, a public
record, as defined under the Freedom of Information Act of 1967, § 25-19-101
et seq., involving a railroad fatality shall be maintained by its custodian
*LGL127*
04-07-2025 10:50:54 LGL127

As Engrossed: S3/18/25 H4/7/25 SB397
in a manner that ensures the confidentiality of the personal information of
the railroad crew involved in the fatality.
(2) If information under subdivision (a)(1) of this section is
publicly disclosed, the personal information of the railroad crew shall be
redacted from the information.
(b)(1) Subsection (a) of this section does not apply if the requestor
is:
(A) The host or employing railroad;
(B) A person authorized by court order to obtain the
information under subsection (a) of this section;
(C) A law enforcement officer;
(D) An attorney for the State of Arkansas;
(E) A staff member of the Arkansas Department of
Transportation; or
(F) The United States National Transportation Safety Board
or a constituent agency of the United States Department of Transportation
acting under a mandate to investigate railroad accidents or incidents.
(2) A request under subdivision (b)(1) of this section shall be
made in written or electronic form.
(3) A person identified under subdivisions (b)(1)(B)-(E) of this
section shall only obtain information under subsection (a) of this section if
access to the information is necessary for the performance of his or her
duties.

/s/D. Wallace











04-07-2025 10:50:54 LGL127